Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 5 Members

46-3-260.
Qualifications of members; provision by articles of incorporation or bylaws for transfer, classification, and termination of memberships.

All persons who may lawfully receive service from an electric membership corporation and who are receiving or have agreed to receive such service shall be members therein, subject to complying with such additional conditions and requirements for membership as are set forth in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the electric membership corporation. The articles of incorporation or bylaws may also provide criteria for, procedures for, and limitations upon the transfer, classification, and termination of memberships in an electric membership corporation.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 10; Code 1933, § 34C-501, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-261.
Liability of members.

A member shall not, solely by virtue of his status as a member, be liable for the debts of an electric membership corporation; and the property of the member shall not, solely by virtue of his status as a member, be subject to attachment, garnishment, execution, or other collection procedure for such debts.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-502, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-262.
Meetings of members generally.

Meetings of members may be held at such place within the service area of the electric membership corporation as may be provided in the bylaws. In the absence of any such provision, all meetings shall be held at a place within the service area of the electric membership corporation designated by the board of directors or, if no place is so designated, then at the registered office of the electric membership corporation in this state.

An annual meeting of the members shall be held at such time as may be provided in the bylaws. In the absence of such designation, the annual meeting shall be held on the second Tuesday of the fourth month following the end of the fiscal year of the electric membership corporation or, if such day is a legal holiday, the next following business day. Failure to hold the annual meeting shall not work a forfeiture; nor shall such failure affect otherwise valid corporate acts. If the electric membership corporation shall fail or refuse to hold the annual meeting on the date provided therefor pursuant to the bylaws or, in the absence of such designation, on the date provided in this Code section and shall thereafter also fail or refuse to hold the annual meeting within 60 days after being requested by any member to do so, the superior court of the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located may, after notice to the electric membership corporation, order a substitute annual meeting to be held upon the application of such member. The superior court may issue such orders as may be appropriate, including, without limitation, orders designating the time and place of such meeting, the record date for determination of members entitled to vote, and the form of notice of such meeting.

Special meetings of members or a special meeting in lieu of the annual meeting of members may be called by the president, the chairman of the board of directors, the board of directors, or such other officers or persons as may be provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, or, in the event there are no officers or directors, then by any member. Special meetings of members or a special meeting in lieu of the annual meeting of members shall be called by the electric membership corporation upon the written request of not less than 10 percent of the members of the electric membership corporation.

Any action required by this article to be taken at a meeting of members of an electric membership corporation, or any action which may be taken at a meeting of members, may be taken without a meeting if written consent setting forth the action so taken shall be signed by all the members. Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote of members and may be stated as such in any articles or document filed with the Secretary of State under this article, except that no consent shall be effective as approval of a plan of merger or plan of consolidation pursuant to Part 10 of this article unless:

Prior to the execution of the consent, the members shall have been given:

A copy of the plan of merger or consolidation or an outline of the material features of the plan; and

A copy of the most recent annual balance sheet and an annual profit and loss statement, or comparable financial statements, of each of the merging or consolidating electric membership corporations or of the merging or consolidating electric membership corporation and foreign electric cooperative, as the case may be; or

The written consent itself conspicuously and specifically states that waiver of the right to receive such information is expressly made.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the electric membership corporation, meetings of the members shall be conducted in accordance with the latest edition of Robert’s Rules of Order; provided, however, that failure to so conduct any meeting shall not render invalid any action taken at such meeting unless objection citing such failure is made at the time such action is taken.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 12; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 359, § 1; Code 1933, § 34C-505, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-263.
Notice of members’ meetings.

Written notice stating the place, day, and hour of the annual meeting of members and, in case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called shall be provided not less than five nor more than 90 days before the date of the meeting by any reasonable means, by or at the direction of the president, the secretary, or the officer or persons calling the meeting, to each member of record entitled to vote at such meeting. Reasonable means of providing such notice shall include, but not be limited to, United States mail, personal delivery, electric membership corporation newsletter, or member monthly service bill. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered when deposited in the United States mail with adequate prepaid postage thereon, addressed to the member at his address as it appears on the record books at the electric membership corporation; provided, however, that if notice is mailed by other than first-class mail, it shall be deemed to be delivered five days from the date of mailing. Personal delivery may be either by personal delivery to the member or by leaving such notice in a conspicuous place at the member’s address as it appears on the record books of the electric membership corporation or at the premises served.

At an annual meeting of members, including any substitute annual meeting ordered in accordance with Code Section 46-3-262, any matter relating to the affairs of the electric membership corporation, whether or not stated in the notice of the meeting, may be brought up for action, except matters which this article, the bylaws, or articles of incorporation require to be stated in the notice of the meeting.

When a meeting is adjourned to another time or place, it shall not be necessary, unless the bylaws require otherwise, to give any notice of the adjourned meeting if the time and place to which the meeting is adjourned are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken; and at the adjourned meeting, any business may be transacted that might have been transacted on the original date of the meeting. If, however, after the adjournment the board fixes a new record date for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given, in compliance with subsection (a) of this Code section, to each member of record on the new record date who is entitled to vote at such meeting.

Notice of a meeting of members need not be given to any member who signs a waiver of notice, in person or by proxy, either before or after the meeting. Unless required by the bylaws, neither the business transacted nor the purpose of the meeting need be specified in the waiver, except that any waiver of the notice of a meeting of members required with respect to a plan of merger or a plan of consolidation shall not be effective unless:

Prior to execution of the waiver, the member signing the waiver shall have been given:

A copy of the plan of merger or consolidation or an outline of the material features of the plan; and

A copy of the most recent annual balance sheet and annual profit and loss statement, or comparable financial statements, of each of the merging or consolidating electric membership corporations or of the merging or consolidating electric membership corporation and foreign electric cooperative, as the case may be; or

The waiver itself conspicuously and specifically states that waiver of the right to receive such information is expressly made.

Attendance of a member at a meeting, either in person or by proxy, shall of itself constitute waiver of notice and waiver of any and all objections to the place of the meeting, the time of the meeting, or the manner in which it has been called or convened, except when a member attends a meeting solely for the purpose of stating, at the beginning of the meeting, any such objection or objections to the transaction of business.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-507, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-264.
Closing of record books and fixing of record date.

For the purpose of determining members entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of members or any adjournment thereof, or in order to make a determination of members for any other proper purpose, the board of directors of an electric membership corporation may provide that the membership books shall be closed for a stated period not to exceed 90 days.

In lieu of closing the membership books, the bylaws or (in the absence of any applicable bylaws) the board of directors may fix in advance a date as the record date for any such determination of members, such date in any case to be not more than 90 days prior to the date on which the particular action requiring such determination of members is to be taken.

If the membership books are not closed and no record date is fixed for the determination of members entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of members, the date on which notice of the meeting is mailed to all of the members shall be the record date for such determination of membership or, if such notice is not mailed to all of the members on the same date, the date ten days prior to the meeting shall be the record date for such determination of membership.

When the determination of members entitled to vote at any meeting of the members has been made as provided in this Code section, such determination shall apply to any adjournment thereof unless the board of directors fixes a new record date under this Code section for the adjourned meeting.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-511, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-265.
Quorum of members; adjournment of meeting by majority of members represented at meeting.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or in bylaws adopted by the members, 10 percent of the members entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum at a meeting of members.

If a quorum is present, the affirmative vote of a majority of the members represented at the meeting shall be the act of the membership unless the vote of a greater number is required by this article, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws.

When a quorum is once present to organize a meeting, the members present may continue to do business at the meeting, or at any adjournment thereof, notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough members to leave less than a quorum.

A majority of the members represented at a meeting, whether or not a quorum is present, may adjourn such meeting from time to time.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-509, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-266.
Voting by members generally.

A member shall be entitled to only one vote in the exercise of his rights as a member of an electric membership corporation.

No member shall have the right to cumulate his votes by giving one candidate a vote or votes equal to his vote multiplied by the number of directors to be elected or by distributing such votes on the same principle among any number of such candidates.

The chairman of the board, the president, any vice-president, the secretary, or the treasurer or other officer of a corporation, club, school, church, or unincorporated association which is a member of an electric membership corporation shall be deemed by the electric membership corporation to have authority to vote such membership and to execute proxies and written waivers and consents in relation thereto, unless before a vote is taken or a waiver or consent is acted upon it is made to appear by a certified copy of the bylaws or resolution of the board of directors, executive committee, or other governing body of the corporation, club, school, church, or unincorporated association holding such membership that such authority is vested in some other officer or person. In the absence of such certification, a person executing any such proxy, waiver, or consent or presenting himself at a meeting as one of such officers of such a member shall, for the purpose of this Code section, be deemed prima-facie to be duly elected, qualified, and acting as such officer and to be fully authorized to so act. In case of conflicting representation, such a member shall be deemed to be represented by its senior officer in the order first stated in this subsection.

Unless it is made to appear otherwise by an affidavit, court order, or other document, or by the instrument creating the position, the following persons shall be deemed to be authorized to vote a membership or execute a proxy, waiver, or consent in relation thereto:

The administrator or executor of an estate which is a member;

A guardian of a member; or

A trustee in whose name a membership is held.

If more than one person holds a position described in paragraphs (1) through (3) of subsection (d) of this Code section with respect to the same membership or if a membership is held by two or more persons, whether as fiduciaries, joint tenants, tenants in common, tenants in partnership, or otherwise, then unless the instrument or order appointing them or creating the tenancy otherwise directs and a copy thereof is filed with the secretary of the electric membership corporation or unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the electric membership corporation otherwise provide, their acts with respect to voting shall have the following effect:

If only one votes, his act binds all;

If more than one vote, the act of the majority so voting binds all;

If more than one vote and the vote is evenly split, each faction shall be entitled to vote the membership in question proportionally;

The principles of subsection (e) of this Code section shall apply, insofar as possible, to the execution of proxies, waivers, consents, or objections and for the purpose of ascertaining the presence of a quorum.

If there is reasonable doubt as to the person qualified to cast the vote of a member or to execute a proxy, waiver, or consent on behalf of a member, the electric membership corporation may deny the right of such member to vote or to execute a proxy, waiver, or consent until sufficient action has been taken by such member to eliminate the uncertainty.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 9; Code 1933, § 34C-503, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-267.
Effect of voting requirements provided for in articles of incorporation or bylaws.

Whenever, with respect to any action to be taken by the members of an electric membership corporation, the articles of incorporation or bylaws require the vote or concurrence of a greater number of the members than required by this article with respect to such action, the provisions of the articles of incorporation or bylaws shall control.

Any such provision in the articles of incorporation or bylaws may not itself be amended by a vote less than the vote prescribed in such provision.

The authorization or taking of any action by vote or concurrence of the members may be rescinded or revoked by the same vote or concurrence as at the time of rescission or revocation would be required to authorize or take such action in the first instance, subject to the contract rights of other persons.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-508, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-268.
Voting by proxy generally.

To the extent, and only to the extent, authorized by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a member may be represented at a meeting of the membership, vote thereat, and execute consents or waivers by one or more persons authorized by a written proxy executed by such member or by his attorney in fact. The exercise of such rights by a person pursuant to a written proxy shall be subject to such limitations and in accordance with such procedures as may be provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws. The exercise of such rights shall, in any event, be subject to the following limitations and procedures:

No proxy shall be valid after the expiration of 11 months from the date thereof unless otherwise provided in the proxy. Every proxy shall be revocable at the pleasure of the person executing it;

No proxy shall be valid if the person granting it is no longer a member or his rights as a member have been lawfully suspended;

Subject to the limitations of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, any proxy duly executed is not revoked and continues in full force and effect until an instrument revoking it or a duly executed proxy bearing a later date is received by the secretary of the electric membership corporation. A proxy is not revoked by the death or incapacity of the maker unless, before the vote is counted or the authority is exercised, written notice of such death or incapacity is received by the secretary of the electric membership corporation. Notwithstanding that a valid proxy is outstanding, the powers of the proxy holder are suspended if the maker is present at a meeting of the members and elects to vote in person;

If the proxy for the same member confers authority upon two or more persons and does not otherwise provide, a majority of such persons present at the meeting, or if only one is present, then that one, may exercise all the powers conferred by the proxy; but if the proxy holders present at the meeting are divided as to the right and manner of voting in any particular case and there is no majority, the vote of the member granting the proxy shall be prorated;

If the proxy expressly provides, any proxy holder may appoint in writing a substitute to act in his place;

A member shall not sell his vote or issue a proxy to vote to any person for any sum of money or anything of value. Any proxy issued in exchange for money or anything of value shall be void.

If proxy voting is authorized in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the electric membership corporation, attendance at a members’ meeting by a proxy holder authorized to vote for a member shall be deemed to be attendance by such member for purposes of determining whether a quorum is present and shall otherwise be considered personal attendance by such member.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 9; Code 1933, § 34C-504, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-269.
Dissenters’ rights.

No member of an electric membership corporation shall, by dissenting from any merger or consolidation to which the electric membership corporation of which he is a member is a party or otherwise, any sale of all or substantially all the assets of such electric membership corporation, or any amendment of such electric membership corporation’s articles of incorporation, have the right to receive any consideration for his membership interest except as provided in the plan of merger or consolidation, the terms of sale, or the amendment of the articles of incorporation.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1803, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-270.
Credentials and elections committee.

The bylaws of an electric membership corporation may provide for the appointment of a credentials and elections committee composed of members who are not officers or directors of the electric membership corporation or candidates for such positions. This committee shall be responsible for the counting of all ballots or votes cast and for ruling on the effect of any ballots or votes irregularly marked or cast and on all other questions that may arise relating to member voting and the election of directors, including, but not limited to, the validity of petitions of nomination or qualification of candidates and the regularity of the nomination and election of directors. The procedures for the appointment and qualification of the members of such committee shall be as provided in the bylaws authorizing and establishing such committee. Any committee member related within the third degree by affinity or consanguinity, computed according to the civil law, to any candidate for director shall refrain from participating in any deliberation or vote of the committee concerning such candidate.

On request of the person presiding at the meeting of the members or on the request of any member entitled to vote thereat, such committee shall make a report in writing of any challenge, question, count, or matter determined by the committee and shall execute a certificate of any fact found by them. Any such report or certificate made by them shall be prima-facie evidence of the facts stated and of the vote as certified by them.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-506, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-271.
Maintenance of books and records of account; inspection of books and records by members; preparation of annual financial statements.

Each electric membership corporation shall keep correct and complete books and records of account, shall keep minutes of the proceedings of its members and board of directors, and shall keep at its registered office or principal place of business a record of its members, giving the names and addresses of all members and the number of members.

Subject to the limitations set forth in this Code section and in other applicable laws, any person who is a member of the electric membership corporation in good standing shall, upon written demand stating the purpose thereof and the books and records sought to be examined, have the right to examine, in person or by agent or attorney, at any reasonable time or times, for any proper purpose, its books and records and, at his own expense, may make extracts therefrom. Any such inspection, however, may be denied or limited upon one or more of the following grounds:

The member refuses to warrant and furnish to the electric membership corporation an affidavit that such inspection is desired for a purpose reasonably related to the business of the electric membership corporation;

The inspection seeks information the release of which would unduly infringe upon or invade the privacy of any person;

The inspection is sought for a dishonest purpose or to gratify mere curiosity, or is otherwise inimical to the lawful interest of the electric membership corporation or is not reasonably germane to the interest of the member as such;

The books and records sought to be inspected deal with trade secrets or information which is privileged, confidential, or proprietary; or

The member refuses to warrant and furnish an affidavit that he has not, within the five years preceding the date of the affidavit, sold or offered for sale and does not now intend to sell or offer to sell any list of members of the electric membership corporation or of any other electric membership corporation, or any list of shareholders of a corporation, and that he has not, within such five-year period, aided or abetted and does not now intend to aid or abet any other person in procuring any list of members or shareholders for such purpose.

If the electric membership corporation or an officer or agent of the electric membership corporation refuses to permit the inspection authorized by subsection (b) of this Code section, the member demanding inspection may apply to the superior court of the county in which the electric membership corporation’s registered office is located, upon such notice as the court may require, for an order directing the electric membership corporation or its officers or agents to show cause why an order should not be granted permitting such inspection by the applicant. The court shall hear the parties summarily, by affidavit or otherwise; and, if the applicant establishes that he is qualified and is entitled to such inspection, the court shall grant an order permitting such inspection, subject to any limitations which the court may prescribe, and shall grant such other relief, including costs and reasonable attorney’s fees, as the court may deem just and proper. The court may deny or restrict inspection if it finds that the member has improperly used information secured through any prior examination of the books and records of account, or minutes or records of members of such electric membership corporation or of any other electric membership corporation, or that any other grounds, as set forth above, exist for denying or restricting such inspection.

Not later than four months after the close of each fiscal year, and in any case prior to the annual meeting of members, each electric membership corporation shall prepare:

A balance sheet or comparable financial statement showing in reasonable detail the financial condition of the electric membership corporation as of the close of its fiscal year; and

A profit and loss statement or comparable financial statement showing the results of its operation during the fiscal year.

Upon written request, an electric membership corporation promptly shall mail to any member of record a copy of the most recent such balance sheet and profit and loss statement or comparable statement.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-510, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-272.
Derivative actions by members.

A derivative action may be brought by a member in the right of the electric membership corporation to procure a judgment in its favor against directors, officers, or other representatives of the electric membership corporation or members or third parties, or any combination thereof, whenever the electric membership corporation has a claim or cause of action which the representatives of the electric membership corporation, in violation of their duties, have failed to enforce, including a claim or cause of action against such representatives for their failure in this respect. However, a derivative action may not be brought until the expiration of 30 days after a member has delivered written demand upon the directors, officers, or other representatives of the electric membership corporation who are alleged to have failed to enforce such cause of action, setting forth the claim or cause of action which is sought to be enforced and the basis therefor.

In a derivative action brought by one or more members in the right of an electric membership corporation to procure a judgment in favor of the electric membership corporation, the complaint shall be verified and shall allege that the plaintiff is a member at the time of bringing the action. It shall further allege that the plaintiff was a member at the time of the transaction of which he complained and that the demand required by subsection (a) of this Code section has been properly made.

Such action shall not be discontinued, compromised, or settled without the approval of the court having jurisdiction of the action. If the court determines that the interest of the members will be substantially affected by such discontinuance, compromise, or settlement, the court shall direct that notice, by publication or otherwise, of the action and the proposed discontinuance, compromise, or settlement thereof be given to the members. If notice is directed to be given, the court may determine which one or more of the parties to the action shall bear the expense of giving the same in such amount as the court shall determine and find to be reasonable in the circumstances.

If such action is successful in whole or in part or if anything is received by the plaintiff or plaintiffs as the result of the judgment, compromise, or settlement thereof, the court may award the plaintiff or plaintiffs reasonable expenses, including reasonable fees of attorneys, and shall direct him or them to account to the electric membership corporation for the remainder of the proceeds so received by him or them.

In any such action instituted after July 1, 1981, the court having jurisdiction, upon final judgment and the finding that the action was brought without reasonable cause, may require the plaintiff or plaintiffs to pay the parties named as defendants the reasonable expenses, including fees of attorneys, incurred by them in defense of such action.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-512, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.